Hawaii statutes.
§201B-7 Tourism-related activities.
(a) The authority may enter into contracts and agreements that include the
following:

(1) Tourism promotion, marketing, and development;

(2) Market development-related research;

(3) Product development and diversification issues
focused on visitors;

(4) Promotion, development, and coordination of
sports-related activities and events;

(5) Promotion of Hawaii, through a coordinated
statewide effort, as a place to do business, including high technology
business, and as a business destination;

(6) Reduction of barriers to travel;

(7) Marketing, management, use, operation, or
maintenance of the convention center facility, including the purchase or sale
of goods or services, logo items, concessions, sponsorships, and license
agreements, or any use of the convention center facility as a commercial
enterprise; provided that effective January 1, 2003, and thereafter, the
contract for management of the convention center facility shall include
marketing for all uses of the facility;

(8) Tourism research and statistics to:

(A) Measure and analyze tourism trends;

(B) Provide information and research to
assist in the development and implementation of state tourism policy; and

(C) Provide tourism information on:

(i) Visitor arrivals, visitor characteristics,
and expenditures;

(ii) The number of transient accommodation
units available, occupancy rates, and room rates;

(iii) Airline-related data including seat
capacity and number of flights;

(iv) The economic, social, and physical impacts
of tourism on the State; and

(v) The effects of the marketing programs of
the authority on the measures of effectiveness developed pursuant to section
201B-6(b); and

(9) Any and all other activities necessary to carry
out the intent of this chapter;

provided that the authority shall periodically
submit a report of the contracts and agreements entered into by the authority
to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president
of the senate.

(b) The authority shall be responsible for:

(1) Creating a vision and developing a long-range
strategic plan for tourism in Hawaii;

(2) Promoting, marketing, and developing the tourism
industry in the State;

(3) Arranging for the conduct of research through contractual
services with the University of Hawaii or any agency or other qualified persons
concerning social, economic, and environmental aspects of tourism development
in the State;

(4) Providing technical or other assistance to
agencies and private industry upon request;

(5) Perpetuating the uniqueness of the native
Hawaiian culture and community, and their importance to the quality of the
visitor experience, by ensuring that:

(A) The Hawaiian culture is accurately
portrayed by Hawaii's visitor industry;

(B) Hawaiian language is supported and
normalized as both an official language of the State as well as the foundation
of the host culture that draws visitors to Hawaii;

(C) Hawaiian cultural practitioners and
cultural sites that give value to Hawaii's heritage are supported, nurtured,
and engaged in sustaining the visitor industry; and

(D) A native Hawaiian cultural education and
training program is provided for the visitor industry workforce having direct
contact with visitors; and

(6) Reviewing annually the expenditure of public
funds by any visitor industry organization that contracts with the authority to
perform tourism promotion, marketing, and development and making
recommendations necessary to ensure the effective use of the funds for the development
of tourism.

(c) The authority may delegate to staff the
responsibility for soliciting, awarding, and executing contracts and for
monitoring and facilitating any and all functions developed in accordance with this
section.

(d) Where public disclosure of information
gathered or developed by the authority may place a business at a competitive
disadvantage or may impair or frustrate the authority's ability to either
compete as a visitor destination or obtain or utilize information for a
legitimate government function, the authority may withhold from public
disclosure competitively sensitive information including:

(1) Completed survey forms and questionnaire forms;

(2) Coding sheets; and

(3) Database records of the information. [L 1998, c
156, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 297, §20; am L 2002, c 143, §4 and c 253, §8; am L
Sp 2009, c 5, §7; am L 2010, c 102, §4; am L 2014, c 131, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next